Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202547-624.01
Division; plan for implementation and funding of reporting centers; duties.

(1) The division shall collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration and the Department of Correctional Services in developing a plan for the implementation and funding of reporting centers in Nebraska.

(2) The plan shall include recommended locations for at least one reporting center in each district court judicial district that currently lacks such a center and shall prioritize the recommendations for additional reporting centers based upon need.

(3) The plan shall also identify and prioritize the need for expansion of reporting centers in those district court judicial districts which currently have a reporting center but have an unmet need for additional reporting center services due to capacity, distance, or demographic factors.

Laws 2010, LB864, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 9;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 53.